New Jersey, session 221, A3208.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, a fire instructor enrolled in the Public Employees Retirement System prior to November 1, 2008, and employed by a county on the effective date of this act, P.L.     ,c.   (C            ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), who had continuous membership in the retirement system, who performed service in the county as a fire instructor in each calendar year of membership, who received a salary for that position greater than $1,500 annually, and who was a permanent career service employee in the civil service, shall be granted service credit for that period of enrollment and considered eligible for membership and for benefits as a member of the retirement system. b.  Any person whose membership in the retirement system was terminated within two years prior to the effective date of this act, P.L.    ,c.    (C.      )(pending before the Legislature as this bill), and who otherwise qualifies for membership under subsection a. of this section but for the termination shall be reenrolled in the retirement system provided the person repays any contributions and interest that were returned when membership was terminated. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.